Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.19.020

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Acquiring person" means a person or group of persons, other than the target corporation or a subsidiary of the target corporation, who is the beneficial owner of voting shares entitled to cast votes comprising ten percent or more of the voting power of the target corporation; provided, however, that the term "acquiring person" does not include any person who (a) beneficially owned voting shares entitled to cast votes comprising ten percent or more of the voting power of the target corporation on March 23, 1988; (b) acquired its voting shares of the target corporation solely by gift, inheritance, or in a transaction in which no consideration is exchanged; (c) equals or exceeds the ten percent threshold as a result of action taken solely by the target corporation, such as redemption of shares, unless that person, by its own action, acquires additional voting shares of the target corporation; (d) beneficially owned voting shares entitled to cast votes comprising ten percent or more of the voting power of the target corporation prior to the time the target corporation had a class of voting shares registered with the securities and exchange commission pursuant to section 12 or 15 of the exchange act; or (e) beneficially owned voting shares entitled to cast votes comprising ten percent or more of the voting power of the target corporation prior to the time the target corporation amended its articles of incorporation to provide that the corporation shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter. An agent, bank, broker, nominee, or trustee for another person, if the other person is not an acquiring person, who acts in good faith and not for the purpose of circumventing this chapter, is not an acquiring person. For the purpose of determining whether a person is an acquiring person, the number of voting shares of the target corporation that are outstanding shall include voting shares beneficially owned by the person through application of subsection (4) of this section, but shall not include any other unissued voting shares of the target corporation which may be issuable pursuant to any agreement, arrangement, or understanding; or upon exercise of conversion rights, warrants, or options; or otherwise.

(2) "Affiliate" means a person who directly or indirectly controls, or is controlled by, or is under common control with, a person.

(3) "Announcement date," when used in reference to any significant business transaction, means the date of the first public announcement of the final, definitive proposal for such a significant business transaction.

(4) "Associate" means (a) a domestic or foreign corporation or organization of which a person is an officer, director, member, or partner or in which a person performs a similar function; (b) a direct or indirect beneficial owner of ten percent or more of any class of equity securities of a person; (c) a trust or estate in which a person has a beneficial interest or as to which a person serves as trustee or in a similar fiduciary capacity; and (d) the spouse or a parent or sibling of a person or a child, grandchild, sibling, parent, or spouse of any thereof, of a person or an individual having the same home as a person.

(5)(a)(i) "Beneficial owner" when used with respect to any shares means a person who individually or with or through any of its affiliates or associates:

(A) Has or shares:

(I) The power to vote, or to direct the voting of, the shares, directly or indirectly;

(II) The power to dispose, or to direct the disposition of, the shares, directly or indirectly;

(III) The right to acquire the shares, whether the right is exercisable immediately or only after the passage of time, pursuant to any agreement, arrangement, or understanding, whether or not in writing, or upon the exercise of conversion rights, exchange rights, warrants or options, or otherwise; or

(IV) The right to vote the shares pursuant to any agreement, arrangement, or understanding, whether or not in writing; or

(B) Has any agreement, arrangement, or understanding, whether or not in writing, for the purpose of acquiring, holding, voting, or disposing of the shares with any other person who beneficially owns, or whose affiliates or associates beneficially own, directly or indirectly, the shares.

(ii)(A) A person is not the beneficial owner of shares under (a)(i)(A)(III) of this subsection with respect to shares tendered pursuant to a tender or exchange offer made by the person or any of the person's affiliates or associates until the tendered shares are accepted for purchase or exchange.

(B) A person is not the beneficial owner of any shares under (a)(i)(A)(IV) of this subsection if the agreement, arrangement, or understanding to vote the shares arises solely from a revocable proxy or consent given in response to a proxy or consent solicitation made in accordance with the applicable rules and regulations under the exchange act and is not then reportable on schedule 13D under the exchange act, or any comparable or successor report.

(C) A person is not the beneficial owner of any shares under (a)(i)(B) of this subsection if the agreement, arrangement, or understanding for the purpose of voting the shares arises solely from a revocable proxy or consent given in response to a proxy or consent solicitation made in accordance with the applicable rules and regulations under the exchange act and is not then reportable on schedule 13D under the exchange act, or any comparable or successor report.

(b) The terms "beneficial ownership," "beneficially own," and "beneficially owned" have meanings correlative to the meaning of "beneficial owner."

(6) "Common shares" means any shares other than preferred shares.

(7) "Consummation date," with respect to any significant business transaction, means the date of consummation of such a significant business transaction, or, in the case of a significant business transaction as to which a shareholder vote is taken, the later of the business day prior to the vote or twenty days prior to the date of consummation of such a significant business transaction.

(8) "Control," "controlling," "controlled by," and "under common control with" means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a person, whether through the ownership of voting shares, by contract, or otherwise. A person's beneficial ownership of voting shares entitled to cast votes comprising ten percent or more of the voting power of a domestic or foreign corporation shall create a rebuttable presumption that such person has control of such corporation. However, a person does not have control of a domestic or foreign corporation if the person holds voting shares, in good faith and not for the purpose of circumventing this chapter, as an agent, bank, broker, nominee, custodian, or trustee for one or more beneficial owners who do not individually or as a group have control of such corporation.

(9) "Domestic corporation" means an issuer of voting shares which is organized under chapter 23B.02 RCW or any predecessor provision.

(10) "Exchange act" means the federal securities exchange act of 1934, as amended.

(11) "Market value," in the case of property other than cash or shares, means the fair market value of the property on the date in question as determined by the board of directors of the target corporation in good faith.

(12) "Person" means an individual, domestic or foreign corporation, partnership, trust, unincorporated association, or other entity; an affiliate or associate of any such person; or any two or more persons acting as a partnership, syndicate, or other group for the purpose of acquiring, holding, or dispersing of securities of a domestic or foreign corporation.

(13) "Preferred shares" means any class or series of shares of a target corporation which under the bylaws or articles of incorporation of such a corporation is entitled to receive payment of dividends prior to any payment of dividends on some other class or series of shares, or is entitled in the event of any voluntary liquidation, dissolution, or winding up of the target corporation to receive payment or distribution of a preferential amount before any payments or distributions are received by some other class or series of shares.

(14) "Share acquisition time" means the time at which a person first becomes an acquiring person of a target corporation.

(15) "Shares" means any:

(a) Shares or similar security, any certificate of interest, any participation in any profit sharing agreement, any voting trust certificate, or any certificate of deposit for shares; and

(b) Security convertible, with or without consideration, into shares, or any warrant, call, or other option or privilege of buying shares without being bound to do so, or any other security carrying any right to acquire, subscribe to, or purchase shares.

(16) "Significant business transaction" means:

(a) A merger, share exchange, or consolidation of a target corporation or a subsidiary of a target corporation with (i) an acquiring person, or (ii) any other domestic or foreign corporation which is, or after the merger, share exchange, or consolidation would be, an affiliate or associate of the acquiring person;

(b) A sale, lease, exchange, mortgage, pledge, transfer, or other disposition or encumbrance, whether in one transaction or a series of transactions, to or with an acquiring person or an affiliate or associate of an acquiring person of assets of a target corporation or a subsidiary of a target corporation (i) having an aggregate market value equal to five percent or more of the aggregate market value of all the assets, determined on a consolidated basis, of the target corporation, (ii) having an aggregate market value equal to five percent or more of the aggregate market value of all the outstanding shares of the target corporation, or (iii) representing five percent or more of the earning power or net income, determined on a consolidated basis, of the target corporation;

(c) The termination, while the corporation has an acquiring person and as a result of the acquiring person's acquisition of ten percent or more of the shares of the corporation, of five percent or more of the employees of the target corporation or its subsidiaries employed in this state, whether at one time or over the five-year period following the share acquisition time. For the purposes of (c) of this subsection, a termination other than an employee's death or disability or bona fide voluntary retirement, transfer, resignation, termination for cause under applicable common law principles, or leave of absence shall be presumed to be a termination resulting from the acquiring person's acquisition of shares, which presumption is rebuttable. A bona fide voluntary transfer of employees between the target corporation and its subsidiaries or between its subsidiaries is not a termination for the purposes of (c) of this subsection;

(d) The issuance, transfer, or redemption by a target corporation or a subsidiary of a target corporation, whether in one transaction or a series of transactions, of shares or of options, warrants, or rights to acquire shares of a target corporation or a subsidiary of a target corporation to or beneficially owned by an acquiring person or an affiliate or associate of an acquiring person except pursuant to the exercise of warrants or rights to purchase shares offered, or a dividend, distribution, or redemption paid or made pro rata to, all shareholders or holders of options, warrants, or rights to acquire shares of the target corporation, and except for involuntary redemptions permitted by the target corporation's charter or by the law of this state or the state of incorporation;

(e) The liquidation or dissolution of a target corporation proposed by, or pursuant to an agreement, arrangement, or understanding, whether or not in writing, with an acquiring person or an affiliate or associate of an acquiring person;

(f) A reclassification of securities, including, without limitation, any shares split, shares dividend, or other distribution of shares in respect of stock, or any reverse shares split, or recapitalization of a target corporation, or a merger or consolidation of a target corporation with a subsidiary of the target corporation, or any other transaction, whether or not with or into or otherwise involving an acquiring person, proposed by, or pursuant to an agreement, arrangement, or understanding, whether or not in writing, with an acquiring person or an affiliate or associate of an acquiring person, that has the effect, directly or indirectly, of increasing the proportionate share of the outstanding shares of a class or series of voting shares or securities convertible into voting shares of a target corporation or a subsidiary of the target corporation that is directly or indirectly owned by an acquiring person or an affiliate or associate of an acquiring person, except as a result of immaterial changes due to fractional share adjustments; or

(g) A receipt by an acquiring person or an affiliate or associate of an acquiring person of the benefit, directly or indirectly, except proportionately as a shareholder of a target corporation, of loans, advances, guarantees, pledges, or other financial assistance or tax credits or other tax advantages provided by or through a target corporation.

(17) "Subsidiary" means a domestic or foreign corporation that has a majority of its outstanding voting shares owned, directly or indirectly, by another domestic or foreign corporation.

(18) "Tangible assets" means tangible real and personal property of all kinds. It shall also include leasehold interests in tangible real and personal property.

(19) "Target corporation" means:

(a) Every domestic corporation, if:

(i) The corporation has a class of voting shares registered with the securities and exchange commission pursuant to section 12 or 15 of the exchange act; or

(ii) The corporation's articles of incorporation have been amended to provide that such a corporation shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter, if the corporation did not have a class of voting shares registered with the securities and exchange commission pursuant to section 12 or 15 of the exchange act on the effective date of that amendment; and

(b) Every foreign corporation required to register to transact business in this state pursuant to chapter 23B.15 RCW and Article 5 of chapter 23.95 RCW, if:

(i) The corporation has a class of voting shares registered with the securities and exchange commission pursuant to section 12 or 15 of the exchange act;

(ii) The corporation's principal executive office is located in the state;

(iii) The corporation has: (A) More than ten percent of its shareholders of record resident in the state; or (B) more than ten percent of its shares owned of record by state residents; or (C) one thousand or more shareholders of record resident in the state;

(iv) A majority of the corporation's employees, together with those of its subsidiaries, are residents of the state or the corporation, together with its subsidiaries, employs more than one thousand residents of the state; and

(v) A majority of the corporation's tangible assets, together with those of its subsidiaries, measured by market value, are located in the state or the corporation, together with its subsidiaries, has more than fifty million dollars' worth of tangible assets located in the state.

For purposes of this subsection, the record date for determining the percentages and numbers of shareholders and shares shall be the last shareholder record date before the event requiring that the determination be made. A shareholder record date shall be determined pursuant to the comparable provision to RCW 23B.07.070 of the law of the state in which a foreign corporation is incorporated. If a shareholder record date has not been fixed by the board of directors within the preceding four months, the determination shall be made as of the end of the corporation's most recent fiscal quarter.

The residence of each shareholder is presumed to be the address appearing in the records of the corporation. Shares held of record by brokers or nominees shall be disregarded for purposes of calculating the percentages and numbers specified in this subsection. Shares of a corporation allocated to the account of an employee or former employee or beneficiaries of employees or former employees of a corporation and held in a plan that is qualified under section 401(a) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, as amended, and is a defined contribution plan within the meaning of section 414(i) of the code shall be deemed, for the purposes of this subsection, to be held of record by the employee to whose account such shares are allocated.

A domestic or foreign corporation shall be deemed to be a target corporation if the domestic or foreign corporation's failure to satisfy the requirements of this subsection is caused by the action of, or is the result of a proposal by, an acquiring person or affiliate or associate of an acquiring person.

(20) "Voting power" means the total number of votes entitled to be cast by all of the outstanding voting shares of a corporation.

(21) "Voting shares" means shares of all classes of a corporation entitled to vote generally in the election of directors.

[ 2017 c 28 s 18; 2016 c 216 s 1; 2015 c 176 s 2147; 1996 c 155 s 1; 1989 c 165 s 198.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.